Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202044-361.01
Rebates; circumventing;
presumptions.

(1) A
licensed agent whose
total commissions and underwriting fees on business written upon the property,
life, health, or liability of himself or
herself, his or
her relatives by consanguinity or affinity, and his or her employer or employees
exceed ten percent of the total commissions or underwriting fees received
during any one license year shall
be presumed to have obtained a license or renewal thereof primarily to circumvent
the enforcement of section 44-361,
except that for a licensed agent soliciting crop insurance, the percentage
shall be thirty percent for commissions and underwriting fees on crop insurance
business.

(2) A licensed agent whose total commissions and underwriting fees on business written upon the property, life, health, or liability of
himself or herself, his or her relatives by consanguinity or affinity, and
his or her employer or employees exceed thirty percent of the
total commissions and underwriting fees received during any one license year shall be conclusively presumed
to have obtained a license or renewal thereof primarily to circumvent the enforcement of section
44-361, except that for a licensed
agent soliciting crop insurance, the percentage shall be fifty percent for
commissions and underwriting fees on crop insurance business.

Laws 1955, c. 175, § 3, p. 503;

Laws 2013, LB59, § 1.